District of Columbia statutes.
38-206

Penalty for failure to provide correct information.

Any parent, guardian, custodian, principal, or teacher of a minor who has reached the age of 3 years who willfully neglects or refuses to provide the information required by §§ 38-202 through 38-206, or who knowingly makes any false statement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 807, ch. 140, Art. II, § 3
renumbered as Art. II, § 5 and amended, Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-247, § 2(a), 38 DCR 376

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-406.
1973 Ed., § 31-210.